Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1820
Existing water impoundment structure; liability; relieved from; when.

Any liability of the type described in section 39-1817 which might arise because of the operation of a water impoundment structure constructed prior to April 3, 1979, shall be relieved by conformance by the county board with section 39-1819 even if conformance with the provisions of section 39-1818 has not been achieved.

Laws 1979, LB 265, § 4.